Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.560

Electric vehicle service provider disclosures.

(1) By January 1, 2023, the electric vehicle service provider must ensure all publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment is clearly marked and discloses all charges, fees, and costs associated with a charging session at the point of sale and prior to a user or a vehicle initiating a charging session. At a minimum, the electric vehicle service provider must disclose to the user the following information at the point of sale, if applicable:

(a) A fee for use of the parking space;

(b) A nonmember plug-in fee from the electric vehicle service provider;

(c) Price to refuel in United States dollars per kilowatt-hour or megajoule;

(d) Any potential changes in the price to refuel, in United States dollars per kilowatt-hour or megajoule, due to variable pricing; and

(e) Any other fees charged for a charging session.

(2) If the charging session or portion of a charging session is offered at no cost, it must be disclosed at the location where the charging session is initiated and prior to a user or a vehicle initiating a charging session.

(3) For the purpose of this section, "point of sale" means the location where the charging session and associated commercial transaction is initiated including, but not limited to, electric vehicle supply equipment or kiosk used to service that electric vehicle supply equipment.

[ 2021 c 238 s 4.]